Hawaii, session 2026, HB863.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that teachers understand their students' needs and tailor their classrooms to create an engaging and effective learning experience. Nationwide, teachers spend an average of $500 out of pocket on their classrooms each year.  To alleviate the financial burden on teachers, the department of education is committed to providing funding for teacher-requested classroom supplies.  The department of education also intends to engage in public‑private partnerships focused on leveraging existing financial resources from both sectors, to provide teachers and students with project-based resources. The purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the department of education for teacher-requested classroom supplies. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $3,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for teacher-requested classroom supplies. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________